Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7781.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 25-1-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 25-1 entitled "Holidays" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
25-1-1. General holidays enumerated.
The first day of January or, in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state
employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as New Year’s Day), the third
Monday of January (as Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday), the third Monday of February (as
Washington’s Birthday), the fourth day of May (as Rhode Island Independence Day), the last
Monday of May (as Memorial Day), the nineteenth day of June or, in the event that day is a
Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as
Juneteenth National Freedom Day), the fourth day of July or, in the event that day is a Saturday or
Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as Independence
Day), the second Monday of August (as Victory Day) (as Peace and Remembrance Day), the first
Monday of September (as Labor Day), the second Monday of October (as Columbus Day), the
eleventh day of November or, in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees
will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as Veterans’ Day), the twenty-fifth day of
December, or in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the
holiday on the following Monday (as Christmas Day), and each of the above days in every year, or
when either of the above days falls on the first day of the week, then the day following it, the
Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in each year in which a general election of state

officers is held (as election day), the first day of every week (commonly called Sunday), and any
other days as the governor or general assembly of this state or the president or the Congress of the
United States shall appoint as holidays for any purpose, days of thanksgiving, or days of solemn
fast, shall be holidays.
SECTION 2. Section 25-1-1.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 25-1 entitled "Holidays" is
hereby repealed.
25-1-1.3. Victory Day — Prohibition against use of other name for holiday.
No state or municipal governmental department or agency shall refer to the second Monday
of August, “Victory Day” by any other name in an advertisement paid for by the department or
agency.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004793
========
LC004793 - Page 2 of 3